California statutes. Elections Code
(1) Consistent with the districting body’s existing obligations under the federal Voting Rights Act, the districting body shall determine whether it is possible to create an election district or districts in which a minority group is sufficiently large and geographically compact to constitute a majority in a single-member district, as set forth in Thornburg v. Gingles, 478 U.S. 30 (1986), and as interpreted in case law regarding enforcement of the federal Voting Rights Act with respect to redistricting. The districting body shall publish on its redistricting web page, at a minimum, the results of its analysis within seven days of completing the analysis or prior to adopting election district boundaries, whichever occurs first.

(2) If the
 districting body, consistent with its existing obligations
 under the federal Voting Rights Act, conducts an analysis to determine whether “racially polarized voting,” as defined in case law regarding enforcement of the federal Voting Rights Act, exists in the local jurisdiction, the districting body shall publish on its redistricting web page, at a minimum, a summary of its analysis and findings within seven days of completing the analysis or prior to adopting election district boundaries, whichever occurs first.

(c) The districting body shall adopt election district boundaries using the following criteria as set forth in the following order of priority:

(1) To the maximum extent practicable, election districts shall be geographically contiguous. Areas that meet only at the points of adjoining corners are not contiguous.
 Areas that are separated by water and not connected by a bridge, tunnel, or regular ferry service are not contiguous.

(2) To the maximum extent practicable, and where it does not conflict with the preceding criterion in this subdivision, the geographic integrity of any local neighborhood or local community of interest shall be respected in a manner that minimizes its division. A “community of interest” is a population that shares common social or economic interests that should be included within a single election district for purposes of its effective and fair representation. Characteristics of communities of interest may include, but are not limited to, shared public policy concerns such as education, public safety, public health, environment, housing, transportation, and access to social services. Characteristics of communities of
 interest may also include, but are not limited to, cultural districts, shared socioeconomic characteristics, similar voter registration rates and participation rates, and shared histories. Communities of interest do not include relationships with political parties, incumbents, or political candidates.

(3) To the maximum extent practicable, and where it does not conflict with the preceding criteria in this subdivision, the geographic integrity of a city or census designated place shall be respected in a manner that minimizes its division. This paragraph does not apply to a city.

(4) To the maximum extent practicable, and where it does not conflict with the preceding criteria in this subdivision, election districts shall be bounded by natural and artificial barriers, by streets, or
 by the boundaries of the local jurisdiction. Election district boundaries should be easily identifiable and understandable by residents.

(5) To the maximum extent practicable, and where it does not conflict with the preceding criteria in this subdivision, election districts shall be drawn to encourage geographical compactness in a manner that nearby areas of population are not bypassed in favor of more distant populations.

(d) The districting body shall not adopt election district boundaries for the purpose of favoring or discriminating against an incumbent, political candidate, or political party.

(e) The districting body shall not adopt election district boundaries using any criterion that is prioritized over the
 criteria in subdivision (c) or that, expressly or as applied, conflicts with one of the requirements in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, except as provided in subdivision (g).

(f) Within 21 days of adopting final election district boundaries, the districting body shall issue a report that explains the basis on which the districting body made its decisions in achieving compliance with the requirements and criteria described in this section, including, as to each neighborhood, community of interest, city, or census designated place that was split into two or more districts, the reason for that split. This paragraph does not apply to a special district or small education district. Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 23003, if a local jurisdiction establishes a hybrid redistricting commission to recommend changes to the legislative
 body’s district boundaries, the report required by this subdivision shall be issued by the districting body, and not by the commission.

(g) Subdivision (c) does not apply to a charter city that has adopted comprehensive or exclusive redistricting criteria in its city charter that includes a requirement to keep whole either communities of interest or neighborhoods. In such a charter city, the report required by subdivision (f) shall explain the basis on which the districting body made its decisions in achieving compliance with the requirements described in this section and the criteria described in the city charter, including, as to each neighborhood or community of interest that was split into two or more districts, the reason for that split. For purposes of this subdivision, “comprehensive or exclusive” means either that the city’s
 charter excludes consideration of redistricting criteria other than those that are identified in the city charter or that the city’s charter provides two or more mandatory traditional redistricting criteria other than the requirement that districts be equal in population.

(h) If a local jurisdiction establishes an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission to recommend changes to the legislative body’s district boundaries, any recommendation adopted by the commission shall comply with the requirements of subdivisions (a) through (e), inclusive, except as provided in subdivision (g).

(i) The criteria and requirements of this section apply to all election district boundaries adopted after January 1, 2024, including district boundaries adopted when a legislative body transitions from
 being elected at-large to elected by districts or from districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21140.

(a) For redistricting occurring in 2031 and thereafter, the boundaries of the election districts shall be adopted by the districting body not later than 204 days before the local jurisdiction’s next regular election occurring after January 1 in each year ending in the number two.

(b) This section does not apply when a legislative body transitions from being elected at-large to elected by districts or from districts.

(c) This section does not apply to a charter city that has adopted a different redistricting deadline by ordinance or in its city charter, provided that, if the county conducts the city’s
 elections, the county is able to administratively accommodate this later deadline. If the county cannot accommodate that deadline, the county shall provide the charter city with the latest deadline the county can reasonably accommodate, which shall be used as the map-adoption deadline for purposes of Section 21180 and which the city shall post to the city’s redistricting web page.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21150.

(a) Before a districting body adopts new election district boundaries, including when a local jurisdiction redistricts following the federal decennial census or between federal decennial censuses, but not including when a legislative body transitions from being elected at-large to elected by districts or from districts, the local jurisdiction shall hold at least one workshop before the districting body draws a draft map or maps of the proposed election district boundaries and the districting body shall hold public hearings, as specified by this section, at which the public is invited to provide input regarding the composition of one or more neighborhoods, communities of interest, or election districts.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, a workshop is a standalone meeting which is conducted by either a local jurisdiction’s staff, a consultant hired by the local jurisdiction, or by one or more members of the districting body but fewer than a majority of the members of the districting body. At each workshop, the local jurisdiction shall provide the public with information on the redistricting process, information on how the public may provide public comment, and instructions on how to use an online mapping tool to create draft maps or community of interest maps, if applicable. Local jurisdictions may, and are encouraged to, assist the public in drawing and submitting draft maps at the workshop. All submitted draft maps and an oral summary that characterizes the number and nature of the public comments received at the workshop concerning
 the proposed boundaries of a neighborhood, community of interest, or election district shall be presented to the districting body at the next public hearing.

(c) This subdivision applies to special districts and small education districts.

(1) After drawing a draft map or maps, the districting body shall hold at least two public hearings. This subdivision does not prevent a districting body from holding a public hearing before drawing a draft map or maps.

(d) This subdivision applies to counties, cities, school districts, community college districts, and county offices of education that are not a small education district.

(1) Before the districting body
 draws a draft map or maps of the proposed election district boundaries, the districting body shall hold at least two public hearings.

(2) After drawing a draft map or maps, a districting body shall hold at least three public hearings.

(e) (1) In lieu of the districting body, an advisory redistricting commission that complies with Section 23002 may hold the public hearings required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d). An advisory redistricting commission may draw draft maps and hold public hearings to consider draft maps, but those public hearings shall not fulfill the districting body’s responsibility to hold public hearings under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(2) In lieu of the districting body, a hybrid redistricting commission, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 23000, may hold the public hearings required by subdivisions (c) and (d) of this section.

(3) A public hearing held by an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with the requirements of this section that would apply to the hearing if the hearing were held by the districting body.

(f) At least two workshops or public hearings shall be held on a Saturday, on a Sunday, or after 6 p.m. on a weekday. 

(g) The building in which a workshop or public hearing is held shall be accessible to persons with disabilities.

(h) To promote the accessibility of the public hearings, the districting body shall permit the public to attend and provide live public comment at each public hearing both in-person and remotely, which should include providing an accessible and clearly audible call-in or internet-based service option. Notwithstanding any other law, the districting body shall not be required to provide a physical location from which the public may remotely provide public comment at a public hearing and the districting body shall not require that the public go to a physical location to remotely provide public comment.

(i) If a public hearing is consolidated with a regular or special meeting of the districting body that includes other substantive agenda items, the public hearing shall begin at a fixed time regardless of its order on the agenda,
 except that the districting body may first conclude any item being discussed or acted upon, including any associated public comment, when that time occurs. The time of the public hearing shall be noticed to the public.

(j) Consistent with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the districting body may reasonably limit an individual’s speaking time at a public hearing. The total amount of time available for all public comment at a public hearing shall not be limited to less than two hours; however, the public comment period may end before two hours if every person desiring to provide public comment has done so.

(k) Subdivisions (f) to (h), inclusive, do not apply to special districts or small
 education districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21160.

(a) The local jurisdiction shall make a good faith effort to encourage residents, including those in underrepresented communities and non-English-speaking communities, to participate in the redistricting process.

(b) No later than four weeks before the first hearing or workshop held pursuant to Section 21150, the legislative body or districting body shall adopt a redistricting public education and outreach plan to inform residents about the local jurisdiction’s redistricting process and how to participate. Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 23003, if a local jurisdiction establishes a hybrid redistricting commission to recommend changes to the legislative
 body’s district boundaries, the public education and outreach plan required by this subdivision shall be adopted by the local jurisdiction, and not by the commission.

(1) A draft version of the plan shall be posted online for a 14-day review and comment period prior to being adopted. In developing the draft plan, the local jurisdiction shall make a good faith effort to consult with organizations that are active in the local jurisdiction, including those active in language minority communities, and shall identify those consulted organizations in the draft report.

(2) The plan shall include a description of all of the following:

(A) How the local jurisdiction will devote the necessary resources on education and outreach to
 ensure that residents, including residents speaking an applicable language, are informed about the local jurisdiction’s redistricting process.

(B) The specific methods the jurisdiction plans to use to inform residents about the redistricting process and how to participate. Examples may include media, including an identification of any media outlets that the jurisdiction plans to use, direct contact with residents, and community events or town halls.

(C) How the local jurisdiction will inform
 organizations that are active in the local jurisdiction, including organizations that requested to be notified of the jurisdiction’s redistricting and organizations active in language minority communities, about the local jurisdiction redistricting process and
 which of these organizations, if any, that the jurisdiction will partner with to inform the public.

(D) Whether and how the local jurisdiction will coordinate its outreach and messaging with other local jurisdictions in the same county that are also redistricting.

(E) The number of workshops and public hearings the local jurisdiction intends to hold and their anticipated dates.

(3) A jurisdiction may use the redistricting public education and outreach template developed pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 21170 when satisfying the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) Throughout the redistricting process, the local
 jurisdiction shall make a good faith effort to provide redistricting information to all of the following:

(1) Media organizations that provide local jurisdiction news coverage, including media organizations that serve language minority communities.

(2) Good government, civil rights, civic engagement, neighborhood, and community groups or organizations that are active in the local jurisdiction, including those active in language minority communities.

(3) Any person that has requested to be notified concerning the local jurisdiction’s redistricting process. The local jurisdiction shall maintain a contact list for all such persons and provide them with regular updates throughout the redistricting process including, at
 minimum, notices of upcoming workshops or public hearings.

(d) The local jurisdiction shall arrange for the live translation in an applicable language of a workshop or public hearing held pursuant to this chapter if a request for translation is made at least 72 hours before the workshop or public hearing, unless less than five days’ notice is provided for the workshop or public hearing, in which case the request shall be made at least 48 hours before the workshop or public hearing.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 54954.2 of the Government Code, the local jurisdiction shall publish the date, time, and location for any workshop or public hearing on the internet at least five days before the workshop or public hearing. However, if there are fewer than 28 days until the deadline to adopt
 boundaries, the local jurisdiction may publish the date, time, and location for the workshop or public hearing on the internet for at least 72 hours before the workshop or public hearing.

(f) (1) A draft map shall be published on the internet for at least 7 days before being adopted as a final map by the districting body provided that, if there are fewer than 28 days until the deadline to adopt boundaries, the draft map may instead be published on the internet for at least 72 hours.

(2) Each draft map prepared by a member of an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, a member of the districting body, or by employees or contractors of the local jurisdiction, or any draft map submitted by the public that a member of the advisory or hybrid
 redistricting commission or districting body asks be discussed or considered at a future public hearing, shall be accompanied by information on the total population, citizen voting age population, and racial and ethnic characteristics of the citizen voting age population of each proposed election district, to the extent the local jurisdiction has that data.

(3) (A) An advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, the districting body, and employees or contractors of the local jurisdiction shall not release draft maps of election districts earlier than three weeks after the block-level redistricting database required by subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the Government Code is first made publicly available. This subparagraph does not prohibit the commission or districting body from holding workshops or public hearings on the
 placement of election district boundaries before the earliest date that draft maps of election districts may be released.

(B) If the period of time between the date that the redistricting database is made publicly available and the map adoption deadline is fewer than 90 days and more than 59 days, the waiting period described in subparagraph (A) is reduced to 7 days.

(C) If the period of time between the date that the redistricting database is made publicly available and the map adoption deadline is fewer than 60 days, the waiting period described in subparagraph (A) does not apply.

(g) (1) The local jurisdiction shall either video or audio record or prepare a written summary of each oral public
 comment, and each deliberation by a districting body or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, made at every workshop or public hearing held pursuant to this chapter. The local jurisdiction shall make the recording or written summary of a workshop or public hearing available to the public on its redistricting web page no later than 14 days after the workshop or public hearing. Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 23003, if a local jurisdiction establishes a hybrid redistricting commission, the local jurisdiction, not the hybrid redistricting commission, shall be responsible for meeting the requirements of this subdivision.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the local jurisdiction shall do both of the following:

(A) At least 72 hours before holding the first
 of its final two workshops or public hearings, make all of the recordings or written summaries of the workshops and public hearings that the local jurisdiction has already held available to the public on its redistricting web page.

(B) Make all of the recordings or written summaries of the public hearings required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 21150 available to the public on its redistricting web page at least 72 hours before the first public hearing required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 21150.

(h) (1) The districting body, or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, shall allow the public to submit written public comment or draft neighborhood, community of interest, or district maps both in a paper format and
 electronically.

(2) The local jurisdiction shall make any written public comments or draft maps available to the public on its redistricting web page no later than 14 days after receiving the public comment or draft map.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the local jurisdiction shall do both of the following:

(A) At least 72 hours before holding the first of its final two workshops or public hearings, make all of the written comments or draft maps available to the public on its redistricting web page, except for any public comment or draft map received less than four business days before that workshop or public hearing.

(B) Make all of the written comments or
 draft maps available to the public on its redistricting web page at least 72 hours before the first public hearing required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 21150, except for any public comment or draft map received less than four business days before that workshop or public hearing.

(i) Prior to holding its first workshop or public hearing, the local jurisdiction shall establish, and maintain for at least 10 years after the adoption of new election district boundaries, an accessible internet web page dedicated to redistricting. The web page may be hosted on the local jurisdiction’s existing internet website or another internet website maintained by the local jurisdiction. Prior to the first workshop or public hearing and until new district boundaries are adopted, the homepage of the local jurisdiction’s internet website
 shall include a prominent link to the redistricting web page. The web page shall include, or link to, all of the following information:

(1) A general explanation of the redistricting process for the local jurisdiction. This explanation shall be provided in English and applicable languages.

(2) An explanation of the procedures for a member of the public to provide in-person or remote oral public comment during a public hearing or to submit written public comment or a draft map to the districting body, or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, either in a paper or electronic format, for consideration at a future public hearing. The explanation shall be provided in English and applicable languages.

(3) A
 calendar of all workshop and public hearing dates. A calendar listing that includes the date, time, and location of the workshop or public hearing dates satisfies the notice required by subdivision (e).

(4) A notice of the applicable languages in which the local jurisdiction will provide live translation of a workshop or public hearing upon request and instructions for making such a request. This notice and these instructions shall be provided in English and applicable languages.

(5) Instructions and a method for a person to sign up to receive regular notices regarding redistricting, including notices of upcoming workshops or public hearings. These instructions shall be provided in English and applicable languages.

(6) The notice and agenda for each workshop and public hearing.

(7) The recording or written summary of each workshop and public hearing.

(8) Each draft map considered by the districting body or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission at a public hearing.

(9) Each written public comment submitted to the local jurisdiction.

(10) The results of the local jurisdiction’s analysis under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 21130.

(11) The existing map of election district boundaries prior to redistricting.

(12) The adopted final map of election district boundaries after redistricting, and where applicable, the report required pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 21130.

(j) This section does not apply when a legislative body transitions from being elected at-large to elected by districts or from districts.

(k) Subdivisions (b) to (g), inclusive, paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (h), and paragraphs (4) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (i) do not apply to special districts or small education districts. Subdivision (i) does not apply to special districts or small education districts that do not have a website for the jurisdiction and are not legally required to establish such a website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21170.

(a) No later than December 15, 2030, and no later than December 15 in each year ending in the number zero thereafter, the Secretary of State shall publish in a conspicuous location on the Secretary of State’s internet website all of the following documents:

(1) A template explaining the local jurisdiction redistricting process that meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 21160.

(2) A template explaining the procedures for providing public comment in the local jurisdiction redistricting process that meets the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 21160.

(3) A template of a notice explaining the languages in which a local jurisdiction is required to provide live translation upon request and how to make such a request that meets the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (i) of Section 21160.

(4) A template of instructions for a member of the public to sign up for regular notices regarding redistricting that meets the requirements of paragraph (5) of subdivision (i) of Section 21160.

(5) A template form for a member of the public to describe and identify the boundaries of a neighborhood or community of interest.

(6) To assist local jurisdictions with complying with this chapter, a template of a redistricting public
 education and outreach plan that can be used to meet the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 21160. 

(7) To assist local jurisdictions with complying with this chapter, a brief summary and checklist of all the requirements imposed on a local jurisdiction by this chapter.

(b) No later than November 1, 2030, and no later than November 1 in each year ending in the number zero thereafter, the Secretary of State shall post online drafts of the documents described in subdivision (a) for at least a 30-day public comment period before finalizing any draft. Prior to posting these drafts, the Secretary of State shall solicit input from good government organizations, civil rights organizations, firms providing redistricting mapping services, and statewide associations representing
 affected local government agencies.

(c) (1) No later than January 1, 2031, and no later than January 1 in every year ending in the number one thereafter, the Secretary
 of State shall publish the applicable languages for each city and county in a conspicuous location on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(2) To determine the applicable languages for each city, in 2030 and in each year ending in the number zero thereafter, the Secretary of State, in consultation with the developer of the database developed in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the Government Code, shall request a special tabulation from the United States Census Bureau of the most recent data on limited English proficiency from the bureau’s American Community Survey that satisfies paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 21110. If the bureau is unable to produce that data, the Secretary of State shall base the Secretary of State’s determination on the table from the American Community Survey
 enumerating the number of residents with limited English proficiency that has the largest number of languages included, that is publicly available, and that was produced within the previous 10 years.

(d) No later than February 28, 2031, and no later than February 28 in each year ending in the number one thereafter, the Secretary of State shall translate the documents described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) in any applicable language required for any city or county and shall publish these documents on a conspicuous location on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(e) Prior to finalizing any translated documents pursuant to subdivision (d), the Secretary of State shall post online drafts of these documents for at least a 15-day public comment period
 before finalizing any draft. Prior to posting these drafts, the Secretary of State shall solicit input from the Language Accessibility Advisory Committee and organizations representing communities that speak each applicable language.

(f) To assist local jurisdictions with complying with this chapter, the Secretary of State shall provide a training to local jurisdictions subject to this chapter and associations representing such local jurisdictions that summarizes the requirements imposed on a local jurisdiction by this chapter. This training shall be video recorded and posted in a conspicuous location on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(g) (1) Within 30 days of the computerized database described in subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the
 Government Code being made available to the public, the Secretary of State shall make available to the public a free electronic mapping tool, loaded with
 relevant population and demographic data for each county and city whose legislative body is elected by district, which tool can be used by the public to create neighborhood maps, community of interest maps, or draft district maps that can be submitted to the local jurisdiction’s districting body or to an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission. The Secretary of State is authorized and encouraged to create a mapping tool for other local jurisdictions whose legislative bodies are elected by district.

(2) Implementation of this subdivision shall be contingent on an appropriation being made for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21180.

(a) If the districting body does not adopt election district boundaries by the deadlines set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 21140 or adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21140, as applicable, the districting body shall immediately petition a superior court in a county in which the local jurisdiction is located for an order adopting election district boundaries. If the districting body does not petition a superior court within five days after the deadline, any resident of the local jurisdiction may file that
 petition.

(b) (1) Upon granting a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a), the superior court shall adopt election district boundaries in accordance with the requirements and criteria set forth in Section 21130, which shall be used in the local jurisdiction’s next regular election.

(2) The superior court may appoint a special master to assist
 the court with adopting the district boundaries. The local jurisdiction shall pay the cost for the special master and associated costs.

(3) The superior court or a special master appointed by the superior court may hold one or more public hearings before the superior court adopts the election district boundaries.

 (4) Subject to the approval of the court, the special master may employ redistricting experts or other consultants or counsel, independent experts in the field of redistricting and computer technology, and other necessary personnel to assist them in their work. The special master may also seek the full cooperation of the local jurisdiction in producing and using any data, computer models and programs, or technical assistance that was made available
 to the districting body or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission and local jurisdiction personnel who are knowledgeable in the mechanics of drafting redistricting legislation. The court may assist the special master in securing the necessary personnel and the physical facilities required for their work and in preparing for the prompt submission to the local jurisdiction of a request for local jurisdiction funding for the necessary expenses of the special master and the special master’s staff.

(c) The election district boundaries adopted by the superior court shall have the same force and effect as an enacted resolution or ordinance of the districting body, but shall not be subject to a referendum.

(d) The superior court may order the adjustment of electoral deadlines
 as necessary to implement the new election district boundaries in the next regular election.

(e) This section does not apply to a charter city that has adopted in its city charter a different method for adopting city council district boundaries when a redistricting deadline is missed.

(f) This chapter does not limit the discretionary remedial authority of any federal or state court, including any authority to award attorney’s fees and costs under other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Congressional Districts [21400. - 21455.]

21400.

This chapter sets forth the congressional districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21401.

Congressional District 01 consists of the following:

Whole Counties in Congressional District 01

BUTTE, GLENN, LASSEN, PLUMAS, SIERRA, TEHAMA

Partial Counties in Congressional District 01

LAKE

Whole Tracts in Lake County

0001.00, 0003.00, 0004.01, 0004.02, 0005.01, 0005.02, 0006.01, 0006.02, 0007.03, 0007.04, 0008.01, 0008.02, 0009.01, 0009.02, 0010.00, 0011.01

Partial Tracts in Lake County

0007.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002,
 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092

0011.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1024, 1026, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1059, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040

0012.00--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050,
 3051, 3052, 3053, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021

0013.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019

0013.02--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006

MENDOCINO

Whole Tracts in Mendocino County

0101.00, 0107.00, 0108.01, 0108.02, 0113.00, 0114.00, 0115.01, 0115.02, 0116.00, 0117.00, 0118.00

Partial Tracts in Mendocino County

0102.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2076, 2078, 2079, 2082, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2099, 2100, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2129, 2135, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2243,
 2244, 2245, 2246, 2248, 2249, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2259, 2260

0103.00--the following census blocks:

5067, 5070, 5071, 5072, 5105, 5106, 5107, 5108, 5109

0106.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067,
 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2073, 2074, 2077, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025

0106.02--the following census blocks:
